Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


HB1161 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8000 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. "Bureau" means the Legislative Service Bureau as established
in Section 450.1 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. "Department" means the Oklahoma Insurance Department as
established in Section 301 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. "Health benefit plan" means a health benefit plan as defined
pursuant to Section 6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
4. "Mandate" means any requirement proposed in legislation or
regulation that obligates health benefit plans to:
a. provide, offer, or expand coverage for specific health
care services or providers, treatments, medical
supplies, or populations, or
b. implement operational or administrative processes such
as prior authorization, reporting requirements, or
claims procedures.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8001 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
No bill providing for a mandate impacting the health plans in
the state may be considered or adopted by the House of

HB1161 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Repr esentatives or the Senate unless there is an impact analysis of
the bill.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8002 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. When the Speaker of the House or Pro Tempore of the Senate
or their delegates decides a bill contains a mandate impacting
health benefit plans as provided for in section 2 of this act, they
shall direct the Legislative Service Bureau to submit such bill to
the Oklahoma Insurance Department for the purpose of conducting an
impact analysis.
B. When conducting such analysis, the Department shall:
1. Analyze the proposed mandate and prepare a written report to
be returned to the Legislative Service Bureau within sixty (60) days
from referral; and
2. Such report shall include, but not be limited to:
a. social impact:
(1) the extent to which the mandate addresses a
significant public health issue,
(2) the number of individuals and demographics
affected by the proposed mandate, and
(3) any anticipated impact on access to health care
services,
b. medical efficacy:
HB1161 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(1) a review of peer-reviewed studies, clinical
guidelines, and other scientific evidence
evaluating the effectiveness of the treatment or
service, and
(2) input from medical experts and professional
organizations as appropriate,
c. financial impact:
(1) the estimated effect on insurance premiums for
consumers and employers,
(2) the potential cost implications for insurers,
health care providers, and state-funded programs
that provide payment for covered services, and
(3) any anticipated impact on the stability of the
state's insurance market.
C. The Department may contract with a third-party vendor who
specializes in actuarial services, insurance mandate reviews, or
other services which the Department deems necessary to carry out the
provisions of this act; and
D. The Department may seek the input and expertise of any
agency of this state to evaluate the potential impact to state-
funded programs that provide payment for covered services.
E. The Bureau shall not submit more than six referrals, equally
divided between the House of Representatives and the Senate, for
analysis to the Department per fiscal year. Any additional referral
HB1161 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

for analysis must be approved by the Department in writing at the
discretion of the Insurance Commissioner before submission by the
Bureau.
F. Upon return of the analysis by the Department to the Bureau,
the Bureau shall provide a copy, by either written or electronic
means, to the author of the legislative measure, the chairman of the
legislative committee(s) to which the measure was referred, and make
such report available on the legislative website, which is
accessible to the general public.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/03/2025 – DO PASS, As Amended.












HB1161 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.